Massachusetts, session 194th, S177.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 40S of the General Laws, as appearing in section 186 of chapter 7 of the acts of
2023, is hereby amended in section 1 by striking out the definitions of “New smart growth
development” and “Smart growth zoning district” and inserting in place thereof the following:-
''New smart growth development'', any new residential or commercial development,
including the substantial redevelopment of existing buildings, subject to the payment of local
property taxes that: (a) occurs in a smart growth or starter home zoning district after the
adoption of such zoning by the community, and (b) is permitted under the provisions of the smart
growth or starter home zoning district. A redevelopment shall be considered substantial if its cost
exceeds 50 per cent of the building's pre-renovation assessed value or if it constitutes a change in
use from nonresidential to residential. ''Smart growth zoning district'', a zoning district adopted
of 2

by a community and approved by the department which is eligible, and which remains eligible
for density bonus payments under chapter 40R including without limitation smart growth zoning
districts as defined in section 1 of chapter 40R and starter home zoning districts as defined in
section 1 of said chapter 40Y.
of 2